District of Columbia statutes.
26-1161.07

Application fees.

(a)

When filing an application, each applicant shall pay the applicable fees prescribed by the Commissioner and any third-party fees. Any fees paid in connection with the processing of an application shall be non-refundable.

(b)

The Commissioner may increase or decrease the fees authorized by this section. The fees shall be fixed at such rates as may, in the judgment of the Commissioner, be necessary to defray the approximate costs of carrying out the regulatory functions set forth in this chapter and the Banking Code. These fees shall not be abated or refunded upon surrender, suspension, cancellation, or revocation of a registration.

Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-172, § 8, 61 DCR 12577